Alabama, session 2026rs, HB652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 13A-6-3, Code of Alabama 1975, as
last amended by Act 2026-64, 2026 Regular Session, is amended
to read as follows:
"§13A-6-3
(a) A person commits the crime of manslaughter if he or
she does any of the following:
(1) Recklessly causes the death of another individual.
(2) Causes the death of another individual under
circumstances that would constitute murder under Section
13A-6-2; except, that he or she causes the death due to a
sudden heat of passion caused by provocation recognized by
law, and before a reasonable time for the passion to cool and
for reason to reassert itself.
(3)a. Knowingly sells, furnishes, gives away, delivers,
or distributes a controlled substance in violation of Section
13A-12-211, which contains fentanyl, any mixture containing
fentanyl, any synthetic controlled substance fentanyl, or any
synthetic controlled substance fentanyl analogue as described
in Sections 20-2-23 and 20-2-25, and the individual to whom
the controlled substance is sold, furnished, given, delivered,
or distributed dies as a proximate result of the use of the
controlled substance. Nothing in this subdivision shall be
construed to apply to a licensed physician engaged in the
practice of medicine, a licensed pharmacist engaged in the
practice of pharmacy, or a licensed dentist engaged in the
Page 2

practice of pharmacy, or a licensed dentist engaged in the
HB652 INTRODUCED
practice of dentistry.
b. It is not a defense to this subdivision that the
person who sold, furnished, gave away, delivered, or
distributed the controlled substance had no knowledge that the
controlled substance contained fentanyl, any mixture
containing fentanyl, any synthetic controlled substance
fentanyl, or any synthetic controlled substance fentanyl
analogue as described in Sections 20-2-23 and 20-2-25.
(4) Drives or operates a motor vehicle or vessel in
violation of Section 32-5A-191 or 32-5A-191.3, and causes the
death of another individual.
(b)(1) Manslaughter is a Class B felony.
(2) Manslaughter under subdivision (a)(3) is a Class A
felony. The court shall sentence the defendant to a minimum of
life imprisonment."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3